Utah statutes.
26-8a-207.   Emergency medical services grant program.
(1) (a)  The department shall receive as dedicated credits the amount
established in Section 51-9-403.  That amount shall be transferred to the
department by the Division of Finance from funds generated by the surcharge
imposed under Title 51, Chapter 9, Part 4, Criminal Conviction Surcharge
Allocation.
(b)  Funds transferred to the department under this section shall be used for
improvement of delivery of emergency medical services and administrative costs
as described in Subsection (2)(a).  Appropriations to the department for the
purposes enumerated in this section shall be made from those dedicated
credits.
(c)  All funding for the program created by this section shall be nonlapsing.
(2) (a)  The department may use the funds transferred to it under Subsection
(1):
(i)  to provide staff support; and
(ii)  for other expenses incurred in:
(A)  administration of grant funds; and
(B)  other department administrative costs under this chapter.
(b)  After funding staff support, administrative expenses, and trauma system
development, the department and the committee shall make emergency medical
services grants from the remaining funds received as dedicated credits under
Subsection (1).  A recipient of a grant under this Subsection (2)(b) must
actively provide emergency medical services within the state.
(c)  The department shall distribute not less than 25% of the funds, with the
percentage being authorized by a majority vote of the committee, as per capita
block grants for use specifically related to the provision of emergency
medical services to nonprofit prehospital emergency medical services providers
that are either licensed or designated and to emergency medical services that
are the primary emergency medical services for a service area.  The department
shall determine the grant amounts by prorating available funds on a per capita
basis by county as described in department rule.
(d)  The committee shall award the remaining funds as competitive grants for
use specifically related to the provision of emergency medical services based
upon rules established by the committee.
